Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.150

Board of trustees—Removal of trustee—Procedure.

The county legislative authority which appointed a member of the board of trustees may remove the member for cause and in the manner provided in this section. Notice shall be provided by the county appointing authority to the trustee and the board of trustees generally. The notice shall set forth reasons which justify removal. The trustee shall be provided opportunity for a hearing before the county appointing authority: PROVIDED, That three consecutive unexcused absences from regular meetings of the board of trustees shall be deemed cause for removal of a trustee without hearing. Any trustee removed for a cause other than three consecutive unexcused absences may appeal the removal within twenty days of the order of removal by seeking a writ of review before the superior court pursuant to chapter 7.16 RCW. Removal shall disqualify the trustee from subsequent reappointment.

[ 1984 c 26 s 12; 1963 c 4 s 36.62.150. Prior: 1933 c 174 s 1, part; 1931 c 139 s 3, part; RRS s 6090-11, part.]